Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.010

Powers and duties—Generally.

The commissioner of public lands shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as are prescribed by law.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.12.010. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 119; RRS s 10877.]